Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.855

Hospital staffing advisory committee—Appointments—Membership—Reporting. (Expires July 1, 2030.)

(1) The department, in consultation with the department of labor and industries, must establish an advisory committee on hospital staffing by September 1, 2023.

(2) Appointments to the advisory committee on hospital staffing shall be jointly made by the secretary and the director of labor and industries. Members of the committee must have expertise in hospital staffing and working conditions and should reflect a diversity of hospital settings.

(3) The advisory committee membership includes:

(a) Six members representing hospitals and hospital systems and their alternates, selected from a list of nominees submitted by the Washington state hospital association; and

(b) Six members representing frontline hospital patient care staff and their alternates, selected from a list of nominees submitted by collective bargaining representatives of frontline hospital nursing staff.

(4) Any list submitted to the departments for the initial appointment under this section must be provided by August 4, 2023.

(5) If any member of the advisory committee is unable to continue to serve on the committee the secretary and the director of labor and industries shall select a new member based on the recommendations of either the hospital association for members appointed under subsection (3)(a) of this section or the collective bargaining representative for members appointed under subsection (3)(b) of this section.

(6) The advisory committee on hospital staffing shall meet at least once per month until the hospital staffing plan uniform form is developed.

(7) The advisory committee on hospital staffing shall advise the department on its development of the uniform hospital staffing plan form.

(8) The department and the department of labor and industries shall provide any necessary documentation to the advisory committee on hospital staffing in advance of the meetings to discuss technical assistance so that the advisory committee may consider areas of needed information.

(9) The advisory committee on hospital staffing must consider innovative hospital staffing and care delivery models, such as those that integrate on-site team-based care delivery, use of patient monitoring equipment and technology, and virtual or remote care delivery. This includes identifying and analyzing innovative hospital staffing and care delivery models including those explored by national organizations and evaluating feasibility of broad-based implementation of identified models. The advisory committee may consider disseminating this information and analysis.

(10) The department and the department of labor and industries must provide the advisory committee on hospital staffing with data on a quarterly basis related to compliance with this chapter, complaint filing and disposition trends, and notification of corrective plans of action plans and adherence to those plans.

(11) By December 1, 2023, the Washington state hospital association shall survey hospitals in Washington state and report to the advisory committee on hospital staffing on Washington hospitals' existing use of innovative hospital staffing and care delivery models including, but not limited to, integration of patient monitoring equipment, remote patient monitoring, team-based care models, apprenticeship and career ladder programs, and virtual or remote care delivery models, and any challenges with implementing the models.

(12) By December 1, 2024, the advisory committee on hospital staffing must review the report prepared by the Washington state institute for public policy as required by section 15, chapter 114, Laws of 2023.

(13) After January 1, 2027, when the forms are developed and effective, the advisory committee on hospital staffing may meet if it is determined by the department of health and committee members that such meetings are necessary.

(14) No earlier than July 1, 2029, the advisory committee on hospital staffing must discuss the issues related to applicability of RCW 70.41.420(7)(b) (i) and (ii) for hospitals listed under RCW 70.41.420(7)(b)(iv). This must include possible data collection options, potential costs, sources of funding, and implementation timeline.

(15) The advisory committee on hospital staffing must advise the department of labor and industries on the department's development by March 1, 2024, of a uniform form for reporting under RCW 49.12.480(2).

(16) This section expires July 1, 2030.

[ 2023 c 114 s 1.]